Vermont statutes. Title 22 Libraries, History, and Information Technology
Subchapter 2. Aid to Local Libraries

§ 631.
General provisions.

On application by the Board of Trustees of a public library in a town, city, or incorporated village not having a free public library owned and controlled by such town, city, or village, the State Librarian may expend $100.00 of the monies annually available for the purposes of this chapter, for books for such town, city, or village, and shall select and purchase books for the purpose of establishing a free public library in that town, city, or village.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 31, 1970; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 632.
Requirements.

A town, city, or incorporated village shall not be entitled to the benefits of section 631 of this title, unless such town, city, or village has elected a Board of Library Trustees as provided in chapter 3 of this title and has voted to instruct such Trustees to make application therefor to the State Librarian and unless such Trustees have provided, in a manner satisfactory to the Board, for the care, custody, and distribution of the books furnished under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 31, 1970; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 633.
Appropriation by municipality.

A town, city, or incorporated village voting to instruct its Board of Library Trustees to make application to the State Librarian under section 631 of this title shall annually appropriate for the maintenance of its free public library a sum not less than $50.00, if its grand list is $10,000.00 or over, or a sum not less than $25.00, if its grand list is less than $10,000.00 and not less than $2,500.00, or a sum not less than $15.00 if its grand list is less than $2,500.00.
The selectboard of such town or the trustees of such village shall annually, in the month of September, draw an order on the treasurer of the town or village, payable to such trustees, for the amount of such appropriation, without the town, city, or village having voted such appropriation.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 31, 1970; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 634.
Aid to free public libraries.

The State Librarian may assist free public or other nonprofit libraries which formulate and implement plans for the systematic and effective coordination of libraries and library services.
Grants may be made in accordance with standards of the service, consistent with the Federal Library Services and Construction Act, chapter 16 of Title 20, U.S. Code as amended.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 31, 1970; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 635.
Requirements.

If the Board of Trustees of a free public library, any part of whose books has been paid for with State funds, fails to provide for the safety and public usefulness of such books or fails to pay the annual appropriation in accordance with section 633 of this title, the State Librarian shall notify in writing the trustees of such library as to the requirements of the State Librarian in respect to such books. If such trustees neglect to comply with such requirements for 60 days after the serving of such notice, such books shall thereafter be under the full control of the State Librarian.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 31, 1970.